Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB265.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 198B.010 TO 198B.290 IS
CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Approved safety pool cover" means a manually-operated or power-
operated safety pool cover that meets all ASTM International performance
standards;
(b) "Barrier" means a fence, dwelling wall, or nondwelling wall, or any
combination thereof, that completely surrounds the swimming pool and
obstructs access to the swimming pool from the yard outside the barrier;
and
(c) "Swimming pool":
1. Means any structure intended for swimming or recreational bathing
that contains water over twenty-four (24) inches deep; and
2. Includes but is not limited to in-ground, above-ground, and on-ground
swimming pools; hot tubs; portable swimming pools; and nonportable
spas.
(2) The department shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS
Chapter 13B to allow swimming pools to be constructed without a barrier if the
swimming pool is equipped with an approved safety pool cover.
(3) The administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section shall be incorporated into the Kentucky Building Code.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/28/2025 8:30 AM Jacketed